src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
 LCnsPhon7 = [ :Cns7 | :n :j | :s :j | :t :j | :t :s ] ;     ! Using Cns7, excluding 1st member of two-cns G3
 LCnsPhon  = [ :Cns8 | :n :j | :s :j | :t :j | :t :s ] ;     ! Using Cns8, without the previous restriction

!! ### G3 vs G2
!! The alternation patterns according to Spiik's alternations series, here named S4, S5, ... for "Spiik alternation series 4, 5, etc." as they are presented in his grammar..  

!! |   Class | Alternation | Series

!! | --- | --- | --- 
!! |  S7 | kkn:k0n           | series 1
!! |  S8 | fºf:f0f           | series 2
!! |  S9 | jgg:j0g           | series 3
!! |  S4 | hkk:h0k           | series 4
!! |  S5 |  xy:zy (no zeros) | series 5
!! |  S6 |  xx:yy (no zeros) | series 6
!! |  S7 |  xy:zy (no zeros) | series 7
!! |  S8 |  ----- (no cg)    | series 8

!! Definition of gradation symbols:

 LowerG2  !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  A definition of Grade2 consonant sequences referring mostly to the surface level
 		   = [
               [
                  (Cns:0)  LCnsPhon7 (Cns:0) LCnsPhon (Cns:0)            ! xy that cannot be G3, since x cannot form xy G3.
               |                                                         ! nijbe,
                  [           ! This section is for 3-cons G2. and for 2cns G2 that share the initial cns with 2cns G3
                     (Cns:0) [:j|:l|:m|:n|:v] (Cns:0) :s :t                  ! S9, 3cns-G2 bäjstov, etc.
                  |
                     (Cns:0) [ :l | :r | :n | :j ]      (Cns:0) :s :k                   ! S9, 3cns-G2 sválskes, etc.
                  |
                     (Cns:0) [  ! 2cns G2 that share the initial cns wit 2cns G3
                                :b (Cns:0) [ :d | :m | :j | :l | :n | :n :j | :r | :s | :t :j | :t :s  ] ! S9, initial b
                                |                                                                        ! gábdev
                                :d (Cns:0) [ :j | :n | :n :j ]                                           ! S7, initial d
                                |                                                                        ! iednev
                                :g (Cns:0) :ŋ                                                            ! S7, initial g
                                |                                                                        ! låg0ŋot
                                :k (Cns:0) [ :n | :k ]                                                   ! S7, initial k
                                |
                                :g (Cns:0) :n                                                            !däggna:degna                        
                             ]                                                                           !
                             |
                             :r (Cns:0)   :s :j :t                                                    ! S9, rsjt, bårsjtav
                             |
                             :r (s:0)   :s :t                                                    ! S9, rsst, bårstav
                             :n (s:0)   :s :l                                                    ! S9, nssl, kánslar-kánsslara+

                  ]
               ]
                 - [ ! Exclude the following sequences, since these are in reality G3:
                     [ d t [ s | j ] ]
                     | b b
                     | d d
                     | g g
                     | k [ s | t | t j | t s ]
                     | f º:0 f
                     | l º:0 l
                     | m º:0 m
                     | n º:0 n
                     | n º:0 n j
                     | ŋ º:0 ŋ
                     | r º:0 r
                     | s º:0 s
                     | s º:0 s j
                     | v º:0 v
                   ]
             ];
 LowerG1  !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  A definition of Grade 1 consonant sequences
           =   (Cns:0)   LCnsPhon ;
 LowerG12  !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  A definition of Grade 1 or 2 consonant sequences 
           = [ LowerG1 | LowerG2 ] ;

 G32  !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  A definition of Grade 3 or 2 consonant sequences
 	 =  f º:0 f | j º:0 j | l º:0 l | m º:0 m | n º:0 n | n º:0 n j | ŋ º:0 ŋ | r º:0 r | s º:0 s | s º:0 s j | v º:0 v ;

 G31  !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  A definition of Grade 3 or 1 consonant sequences which is not SMJ-grammar only for err/orths
 	 =  f:0 º:0 f | j:0 º:0 j | l:0 º:0 l | m:0 º:0 m | n:0 º:0 n | n:0 º:0 n j | ŋ:0 º:0 ŋ | r:0 º:0 r | s:0 º:0 s | s:0 º:0 s j | v:0 º:0 v ;
 	 
 G3  !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  A definition of Grade 3 consonant sequences 
 	=[ Cns Cns Cns Cns |
      :b       b   m          |
      :d       d  [n|j]       |
      :g       g   ŋ          |
       k       k   n          |
       l       l  [d|j|t]     |
       m       m  [b|p]       |
       n       n   d          |
       ŋ       ŋ  [g|k]       |
       p       p  [s|t]       |
       s       s  [k|m|n|t]   |
       b  [    d d
          |    j j
          |    l l
          |    n n
          |    r r
          |    s s]           |
       j  [    b b
          |    d d
          |    g g
          |    k k
          |    l l
          |    m m
          |(h) n n
          |    ŋ ŋ
          |    p p
          |    r r
          |    s s
          |    t t
          |    v v]         |
       l [b b|f f|g g|k k|m m|ŋ ŋ|p p|s s|v v] |
       m [k k|s s] |
       n s s l |
       n s s   |
       ŋ [n n |t t]|
       r [b b|[d|:d] d|f f|g g|j j|k k|m m|n n|ŋ ŋ|p p|s s|t t|v v|d d]|
       v [d d|g g|k k|l l| (h) n n|ŋ ŋ|r r|s s|t t]|
       h [[k|:k] k|[p|:p] p|[t|:t] t]|
       d t [j|s]|
       b b|d d|g g|
       k[s|t[j|s]]] ;

!diphtsimpl IF Vow: G32 AND G2 context - [Y6 Y7 Y9];
! oa:å <=> Vow: G32 Vow: WeG ; ! Evt. a subset of WeG, if only some WeG Dummys trigger diphtsimpl

! 1.86, let's see
!
!Definitions
!
! CnsPhon = [ [ Cns7 | Cns8: ] | n j | s j | t j | t s ] ;
! G3      = [ [ CnsPhon CnsPhon [ CnsPhon+ | º] ] - [[[j|l|m|n|v] s t ] | [l|r] s k | r s j t ] ] ;
! G2      = [   CnsPhon CnsPhon |                   [[[j|l|m|n|v] s t ] | [l|r] s k | r s j t ] ] ;
! G1      =     CnsPhon ;
! G12     = [ G1 | G2 ] ;
!
! LowerCnsPhon = [ :Cns7 | :n :j | :s :j | :t :j | :t :s ] ;
! LowerG2  = [ (Cns:0)  LowerCnsPhon (Cns:0) LowerCnsPhon (Cns:0) |
!              (Cns:0) [[[:j|:l|:m|:n|:v] :s :t ] |
!              (Cns:0) [:l|:r] :s :k |
!              (Cns:0)  :r :s :j :t ] ] ;
! LowerG1  = (Cns:0)   LowerCnsPhon ;
! LowerG12 = [ LowerG1 | LowerG2 ] ;



Rules !!≈ # The @CODE@ section

!! ## Overview

!! The rules section has the following chapters: Consonant alternations in certain pos, vowel lengthening, diphthong simplification, stem vowel alternations, consonant gradation rules


!! ## Consonant alternations in certain pos

!! All rules deal with word-final position.

! This is a dummy negative test, in order to get the test paradigm work.

!!$ a
!!$ b


"Word Final Devoicing of Certain Single Consonants d9 etc." 
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (Cns:) (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) _ (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) \[ Vow | Cns | Ø4: ]* [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;
       where Cx in ( b9 d9 g9 h9 )
             Cy in ( p  t  k  j  )
       matched ;
!!€ iemed9#
!!€ iemet#


"Word Final Devoicing of Certain Single Consonants m9-v" 
!! **@RULENAME@**  ! Spilt up because of err/orths ending on v, gierkav> we want err/orth gierkkam 
 Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (Cns:) (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) _ (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) \[ Vow | Cns |  Ø4: | Ø3: ]* [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ; !ingenting etter m9
 !          Vow: (Cns:) (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) _ (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) [ Ø4: | Ø3: ] [ Vow | Cns] ; !skal være cns eller vow etter m9, gir gierkavij

       where Cx in ( m9)
             Cy in ( v )
       matched ;
!!€ gierkkam9>Q1
!!€ gier0kav>0

!!€ gierkkam9>a
!!€ gierkkam>a

!!€ gierkkam9>ij
!!€ gierkkam>ij

!!€ gierkkam9>Q1X1n
!!€ gier0ka0>00n

!€ gierkkam9>Q1
!€ gier0kav>0

!€ gierkkam9>Q1
!€ gier0kav>0

!"Word Final Devoicing of Certain Single Consonants m9-m" 
!!! **@RULENAME@**  ! Err/orth rule making v>m in nominatives
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (Cns:) (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) _ (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) \[ Vow | Cns ]* [ Ø4: | Ø3: ] [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;
!       where Cx in ( m9)
!             Cy in ( m )
!       matched ;

"Err/Orths." 
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (Cns:) (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) _ (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) Ø4: ;
       where Cx in ( b9 d9 h9 )
             Cy in ( p  t  j  )
       matched ;



"Word final weakening -tj and -ttj to -sj part 1"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 t:s <= Vow: (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) ( d: ) _ j (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) \[ Vow | Cns ]* [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;


"Word final weakening -tj and -ttj to -sj part 2"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 t:s => Vow: (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) ( d: ) _ j (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) \[ Vow | Cns ]* [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;
! t:s <=> Vow: (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) _ ( t: ) j (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;
!!€ jågåtj
!!€ jågåsj

!!€ gålºleX7tj
!!€ gål0lå0sj

!"Word final weakening of -ttj to -sj"
! t:0 <=> Vow: t:s _ j (%>:) (»:) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;
! oajválattja : oajválasj This is moved to the t:0 rule set.
! Still, this will fail if and when clitics are added to the word.
! d:s changed to d:

"Word Final Deletion of n8 m8 g8 h8"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  Cx:0 <=> Vow _  (%>:) (»:) X3: ;
	where Cx in ( DelCns ) ;
! The twoL-sme had [X4:|X8:|X6: Cons:|X9:], be prepared to
! expand this rule accordingly.

!!€ loavddag8X3#
!!€ l0åv0da00#


"Word Final Neutralization of g8, h8, m8"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  Cx:Cy <=> Vow _  (%>:) (»:) X2: [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ]  ;
			where Cx in (g8 h8 m8)
			      Cy in (t  t  n )
			matched ;
! The twol-sme had [X2: | X7: ], be prepared to expand this rule accordingly.
! Since we use X2, the "2" in g8 etc. may be superfluous...

!"Word-final Devoicing of d9, m9"
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow _  (%>:) (»:) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;
!       where Cx in ( d9 m9 )
!	          Cy in ( t  v  )
!	     matched ;
! iemet:iemeda


"Deleting Final h9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 h9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;

"Deleting Final l9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 l9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) [Q1:|X3:] X1: n ;

"Deleting Final m9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 m9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;

"Deleting Final n9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 n9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;

"Deleting Final r9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 r9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;



!      where Cx in ( s m h ) ;
! originally it was true for s, m, h. Keep an eye on this.

"optional Word Final Cluster Simplification"  ! málestit : máles
 t:0 /<= Vow (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) s _ Ø1: (%>:) (»:) (Hyph) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ]  ;
!be prepared to define more rules on cluster simpl.
!moved to Consonant gradation
!!€ málest#
!!€ máles0#


!! ## Vowel lengthening

!! The second syllable vowel a is lengthened to á whenever the stem consonants are in grade 1 and the first syllable vowel is short. Short vowels cannot preceed and follow a single intervocalic consonant.

"Compulsatory lengthening in grade I even-syllables"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
! a:á <=>  Cns  [ a|i|u ] [ Cns:0 Cns: | Cns: Cns:0 ] _ (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! in grade I. Gussa-gusá
